Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-174
Effect of merger.

(RULLCA 1005) (a) When a merger becomes
effective:

(1) the surviving organization
continues or comes into existence;

(2) each constituent organization that merges into
the surviving organization ceases to exist as a separate entity;

(3) all property owned
by each constituent organization that ceases to exist vests in the surviving
organization;

(4)
all debts, obligations, or other liabilities of each constituent organization
that ceases to exist continue as debts, obligations, or other liabilities
of the surviving organization;

(5) an action or proceeding pending by or against
any constituent organization that ceases to exist may be continued as if the
merger had not occurred;

(6)
except as prohibited by other law, all of the rights, privileges, immunities,
powers, and purposes of each constituent organization that ceases to exist
vest in the surviving organization;

(7) except as otherwise provided in the plan of merger,
the terms and conditions of the plan of merger take effect; and

(8) except as otherwise
agreed, if a constituent limited liability company ceases to exist, the merger
does not dissolve the limited liability company for the purposes of sections
21-147 to 21-154;

(9)
if the surviving organization is created by the merger:

(A) if it is a limited
liability company, the certificate of organization becomes effective; or

(B) if it is an organization
other than a limited liability company, the organizational document that creates
the organization becomes effective; and

(10) if the surviving organization preexisted the
merger, any amendments provided for in the articles of merger for the organizational
document that created the organization become effective.

(b) A surviving organization
that is a foreign organization consents to the jurisdiction of the courts
of this state to enforce any debt, obligation, or other liability owed by
a constituent organization, if before the merger the constituent organization
was subject to suit in this state on the debt, obligation, or other liability.

Laws 2010, LB888, § 74.